Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB334.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 1008YC (10) 91 th/ns H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 REBUILD IOWA INFRASTRUCTURE FUND 2 Section 1. REBUILD IOWA INFRASTRUCTURE FUND ââ 3 APPROPRIATIONS. There is appropriated from the rebuild Iowa 4 infrastructure fund created in section 8.57 to the following 5 state entities for the following fiscal years, the following 6 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 7 purposes designated: 8 1. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES 9 a. For maintenance projects at the state historical 10 building: 11 FY 2025-2026: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000,000 13 b. For identifying, assessing, and prioritizing routine 14 and major maintenance projects at the Terrace Hill facility 15 described in section 8A.326, subsection 3: 16 FY 2025-2026: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 125,000 18 The department of administrative services shall submit a 19 report to the governor and the general assembly on or before 20 January 1, 2026, detailing the short-term and long-term 21 maintenance projects at the Terrace Hill facility as 22 identified, assessed, and prioritized by a design professional. 23 The scope of the report must include but is not limited 24 to maintenance projects for the exterior envelope of all 25 structures at the Terrace Hill facility, the reflecting pool, 26 pavement, lighting, storage, and landscaping. 27 2. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND LAND STEWARDSHIP 28 a. (1) For deposit in the water quality initiative fund 29 created in section 466B.45 for purposes of supporting the 30 water quality initiative administered by the division of soil 31 conservation and water quality as provided in section 466B.42 , 32 including salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 33 purposes, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3 , paragraph 34 âcâ: 35 -1- LSB 1008YC (10) 91 th/ns 1/ 20 H.F. _____ FY 2025-2026: 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,200,000 2 (2) (a) The moneys appropriated in this lettered 3 paragraph shall be used to support demonstration projects in 4 subwatersheds as designated by the department that are part 5 of high-priority watersheds identified by the water resources 6 coordinating council. 7 (b) The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph 8 shall be used to support demonstration projects in watersheds 9 generally, including regional watersheds, as designated by the 10 division, and high-priority watersheds identified by the water 11 resources coordinating council. 12 (3) In supporting projects in watersheds and subwatersheds 13 as provided in subparagraph (2), all of the following apply: 14 (a) The demonstration projects must utilize water quality 15 practices as described in the latest revision of the document 16 entitled âIowa Nutrient Reduction Strategyâ initially presented 17 in November 2012 by the department of agriculture and land 18 stewardship, the department of natural resources, and Iowa 19 state university of science and technology. 20 (b) The division shall implement demonstration projects 21 as provided in subparagraph division (a) by providing 22 for participation by persons who hold a legal interest in 23 agricultural land used in farming. To every extent practical, 24 the division shall provide for collaborative participation by 25 such persons who hold a legal interest in agricultural land 26 located within the same subwatershed. 27 (c) The division shall implement demonstration projects on 28 a cost-share basis as determined by the division. Except for 29 edge-of-field practices, the stateâs share of the amount shall 30 not exceed 50 percent of the estimated cost of establishing the 31 practice as determined by the division or 50 percent of the 32 actual cost of establishing the practice, whichever is less. 33 (d) The demonstration projects shall be used to educate 34 other persons about the feasibility and value of establishing 35 -2- LSB 1008YC (10) 91 th/ns 2/ 20 H.F. _____ similar water quality practices. The division shall promote 1 field day events for purposes of allowing interested persons to 2 establish water quality practices on such personsâ agricultural 3 land. 4 (e) The division shall conduct water quality evaluations 5 within supported subwatersheds. Within a reasonable period 6 after accumulating information from such evaluations, the 7 division shall create an aggregated database of water quality 8 practices. Any information identifying a person holding a 9 legal interest in agricultural land or specific agricultural 10 land shall be a confidential record. 11 (4) The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph 12 shall be used to support education and outreach in a manner 13 that encourages persons who hold a legal interest in 14 agricultural land used for farming to implement water quality 15 practices, including the establishment of such practices in 16 watersheds generally, and not limited to subwatersheds or 17 high-priority watersheds. 18 (5) The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph 19 may be used to contract with persons to coordinate the 20 implementation of efforts provided in this lettered paragraph. 21 (6) The moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph 22 may be used by the department to support urban soil and water 23 conservation efforts, which may include but are not limited 24 to management practices related to bioretention, landscaping, 25 the use of permeable or pervious pavement, and soil quality 26 restoration. The moneys shall be allocated on a cost-share 27 basis as provided in chapter 161A . 28 (7) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 29 contrary, the department may use moneys appropriated in this 30 lettered paragraph to carry out the provisions of this lettered 31 paragraph on a cost-share basis in combination with other 32 moneys available to the department from a state or federal 33 source. 34 (8) Not more than 10 percent of the moneys appropriated in 35 -3- LSB 1008YC (10) 91 th/ns 3/ 20 H.F. _____ this lettered paragraph may be used for costs of administration 1 and implementation of the water quality initiative administered 2 by the division. 3 b. For deposit in the renewable fuel infrastructure fund 4 created in section 159A.16 for renewable fuel infrastructure 5 programs: 6 FY 2025-2026: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,000,000 8 The appropriation made in this lettered paragraph is in lieu 9 of the standing appropriation from the general fund of the 10 state in section 159A.17 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 11 2025, which shall be zero. 12 c. For updating the maximum return to nitrogen modeling 13 system for fertilizer management, notwithstanding section 8.57, 14 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 15 FY 2025-2026: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 17 Any information received, collected, or held for purposes 18 of this lettered paragraph is a confidential record exempt 19 from public release if the information identifies a person 20 who holds a legal interest in agricultural land or who has 21 previously held a legal interest in agricultural land, a person 22 who is involved or who was previously involved in managing 23 the agricultural land or producing crops or livestock on 24 the agricultural land, or the identifiable location of the 25 agricultural land. 26 3. DEPARTMENT FOR THE BLIND 27 For building repairs for the building located at 524 Fourth 28 Street, Des Moines, Iowa: 29 FY 2025-2026: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 559,000 31 4. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS 32 For the renovation and construction of a central office for 33 community-based corrections located in district 4: 34 FY 2025-2026: 35 -4- LSB 1008YC (10) 91 th/ns 4/ 20 H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,163,847 1 FY 2026-2027: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,775,898 3 5. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY 4 a. For deposit in the community attraction and tourism 5 fund created in section 15F.204, notwithstanding section 8.57, 6 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 7 FY 2025-2026: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,000,000 9 b. For deposit in the destination Iowa fund created in 10 section 15.281, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, 11 paragraph âcâ: 12 FY 2025-2026: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,000,000 14 c. For grants to nonprofit organizations committed to 15 strengthening communities through youth development, healthy 16 living, and social responsibility for costs associated with 17 the renovation and maintenance of facility infrastructure at 18 facilities located in cities with a population of less than 19 28,000 as determined by the 2020 federal decennial census: 20 FY 2025-2026: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 250,000 22 d. For providing a grant to the entity in possession of 23 the U.S.S. Iowa (BB-61) for purposes of deck replacement, 24 notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 25 FY 2025-2026: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 750,000 27 e. For signage indicating and marking locations in Iowa that 28 were used to provide shelter or aid as part of the underground 29 railroad: 30 FY 2025-2026: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 40,000 32 f. For costs associated with renovation and maintenance 33 projects at Blood Run national historic landmark: 34 FY 2025-2026: 35 -5- LSB 1008YC (10) 91 th/ns 5/ 20 H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,600,000 1 6. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION 2 For costs associated with replacing the KDIN tower, 3 transmitter, antenna, and rigging controlled by the public 4 broadcasting division of the department of education: 5 FY 2025-2026: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,855,800 7 FY 2026-2027: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,686,600 9 7. IOWA LAW ENFORCEMENT ACADEMY 10 a. For the construction of a driving training facility: 11 FY 2025-2026: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 15,000,000 13 b. For planning the construction of an outdoor firing range: 14 FY 2025-2026: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 16 8. IOWA STATE FAIR AUTHORITY 17 For the construction of an agriculture education facility: 18 FY 2025-2026: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,500,000 20 FY 2026-2027: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,500,000 22 9. DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES 23 a. For implementation of lake projects that have 24 established watershed improvement initiatives and community 25 support in accordance with the departmentâs annual lake 26 restoration plan and report, notwithstanding section 8.57, 27 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 28 FY 2025-2026: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 9,600,000 30 b. For state park infrastructure improvements: 31 FY 2025-2026: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,000,000 33 c. For water trails and low head dam safety grants, 34 including grants for projects relating to eligible water 35 -6- LSB 1008YC (10) 91 th/ns 6/ 20 H.F. _____ bodies, as defined in section 456A.33C, notwithstanding section 1 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 2 FY 2025-2026: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500,000 4 d. For grants to communities or organizations for tree 5 planting projects through the community forestry grant program, 6 notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 7 FY 2025-2026: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 250,000 9 e. For providing funding assistance to eligible 10 communities, as described in section 455E.11, subsection 2, 11 paragraph âaâ, subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (d), 12 to address abandoned buildings by promoting waste abatement, 13 diversion, selective dismantlement of building components, 14 and recycling, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, 15 paragraph âcâ: 16 FY 2025-2026: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 800,000 18 10. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC DEFENSE 19 a. For major maintenance projects at national guard 20 armories and facilities: 21 FY 2025-2026: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,100,000 23 b. For improvement projects for Iowa national guard 24 installations and readiness centers to support operations and 25 training requirements: 26 FY 2025-2026: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,100,000 28 c. For construction improvement projects at the Camp Dodge 29 facility: 30 FY 2025-2026: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 550,000 32 d. The department of public defense shall report to the 33 general assembly by December 15, 2025, regarding the projects 34 the department has funded or intends to fund from moneys 35 -7- LSB 1008YC (10) 91 th/ns 7/ 20 H.F. _____ appropriated to the department pursuant to this subsection. 1 11. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY 2 a. For payments and other costs due under a financing 3 agreement entered into by the treasurer of state for building 4 the statewide interoperable communications system pursuant to 5 section 29C.23, subsection 2, notwithstanding section 8.57, 6 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 7 FY 2025-2026: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,486,177 9 b. For deposit in the public safety equipment fund created 10 in section 80.48, notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3, 11 paragraph âcâ: 12 FY 2025-2026: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,500,000 14 12. BOARD OF REGENTS 15 a. For allocation by the state board of regents to the 16 state university of Iowa, Iowa state university of science 17 and technology, and the university of northern Iowa to 18 reimburse the institutions for deficiencies in the operating 19 funds resulting from the pledging of tuition, student fees 20 and charges, and institutional income to finance the cost of 21 providing academic and administrative buildings and facilities 22 and utility services at the institutions: 23 FY 2025-2026: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 25,600,000 25 b. For the renovation and construction of the public policy 26 center at the commons at the university of northern Iowa: 27 FY 2025-2026: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 29 FY 2026-2027: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,720,000 31 FY 2027-2028: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,000,000 33 FY 2028-2029: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,000,000 35 -8- LSB 1008YC (10) 91 th/ns 8/ 20 H.F. _____ c. For renovation and maintenance projects at Atanasoff 1 hall at the Iowa state university of science and technology: 2 FY 2026-2027: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,500,000 4 FY 2027-2028: 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,500,000 6 13. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 7 a. For acquiring, constructing, and improving recreational 8 trails within the state: 9 FY 2025-2026: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,500,000 11 b. For deposit in the public transit infrastructure grant 12 fund created in section 324A.6A, for projects that meet 13 the definition of vertical infrastructure in section 8.57, 14 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 15 FY 2025-2026: 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,500,000 17 c. For deposit in the railroad revolving loan and grant 18 fund created in section 327H.20A, notwithstanding section 8.57, 19 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ: 20 FY 2025-2026: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 22 d. For vertical infrastructure improvements at the 23 commercial service airports within the state: 24 FY 2025-2026: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,900,000 26 e. For vertical infrastructure improvements at general 27 aviation airports within the state: 28 FY 2025-2026: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 30 14. TREASURER OF STATE 31 For distribution in accordance with chapter 174 to qualified 32 fairs that belong to the association of Iowa fairs for county 33 fair vertical infrastructure improvements: 34 FY 2025-2026: 35 -9- LSB 1008YC (10) 91 th/ns 9/ 20 H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,060,000 1 Sec. 2. REVERSION. For purposes of section 8.33, unless 2 specifically provided otherwise, unencumbered or unobligated 3 moneys from an appropriation made in this division of this Act 4 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for 5 the purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year that 6 ends two years after the end of the fiscal year for which the 7 appropriation is made. However, if the project or projects for 8 which such appropriation was made are completed in an earlier 9 fiscal year, unencumbered or unobligated moneys shall revert at 10 the close of that same fiscal year. 11 Sec. 3. Section 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph d, 12 subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (f), Code 2025, is 13 amended to read as follows: 14 (f) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2018, and for 15 each fiscal year thereafter, the total moneys in excess of 16 the moneys remaining wagering tax receipts received pursuant 17 to sections 99D.17 and 99F.11 not otherwise deposited under 18 this paragraph âdâ in the revenue bonds debt service fund, the 19 revenue bonds federal subsidy holdback fund, the vision Iowa 20 fund, the water quality infrastructure fund, the Iowa skilled 21 worker and job creation fund, and the general fund of the state 22 shall be deposited in the rebuild Iowa infrastructure fund and 23 shall be used as provided in this section subsection . 24 Sec. 4. Section 8.57, subsection 3, paragraph d, 25 subparagraph (3), Code 2025, is amended by striking the 26 subparagraph. 27 Sec. 5. Section 12.72, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 28 to read as follows: 29 3. Moneys Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys in the 30 vision Iowa fund are not subject to section 8.33 that remain 31 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of a fiscal year shall 32 be deposited in the rebuild Iowa infrastructure fund created 33 in section 8.57 . Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2 , 34 interest or earnings on moneys in the fund shall be credited 35 -10- LSB 1008YC (10) 91 th/ns 10/ 20 H.F. _____ to the fund. 1 Sec. 6. Section 15.261, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 2 to read as follows: 3 3. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2 , interest or 4 earnings on moneys deposited in the vacant buildings demolition 5 fund shall be credited to the vacant buildings demolition 6 fund. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys credited to in the 7 vacant buildings demolition fund that remain unencumbered or 8 unobligated at the close of a fiscal year shall not revert at 9 the close of a fiscal year be deposited in the rebuild Iowa 10 infrastructure fund created in section 8.57 . 11 Sec. 7. Section 15.262, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 12 to read as follows: 13 3. Notwithstanding section 12C.7, subsection 2 , interest 14 or earnings on moneys deposited in the vacant buildings 15 rehabilitation fund shall be credited to the vacant buildings 16 rehabilitation fund. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys 17 credited to in the vacant buildings rehabilitation fund 18 that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the close of a 19 fiscal year shall not revert at the close of a fiscal year be 20 deposited in the rebuild Iowa infrastructure fund created in 21 section 8.57 . 22 Sec. 8. EFFECTIVE DATE. The following, being deemed of 23 immediate importance, take effect upon enactment: 24 1. The section of this division of this Act amending section 25 12.72, subsection 3. 26 2. The section of this division of this Act amending section 27 15.261, subsection 3. 28 3. The section of this division of this Act amending section 29 15.262, subsection 3. 30 DIVISION II 31 TECHNOLOGY REINVESTMENT FUND 32 Sec. 9. TECHNOLOGY REINVESTMENT FUND. There is 33 appropriated from the technology reinvestment fund created in 34 section 8.57C to the following state entities for the fiscal 35 -11- LSB 1008YC (10) 91 th/ns 11/ 20 H.F. _____ year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 1 following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 2 used for the purposes designated: 3 1. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS 4 For technology projects and upgrades: 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,013,466 6 2. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY 7 For the purchase of an enterprise management system: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 5,375,000 9 3. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION 10 a. For the continued development and implementation of an 11 educational data warehouse that will be utilized by teachers, 12 parents, school district administrators, area education agency 13 staff, department of education staff, and policymakers: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 600,000 15 Of the moneys appropriated in this lettered paragraph, the 16 department may use a portion for an e-transcript data system 17 capable of tracking students throughout the studentsâ education 18 via interconnectivity with multiple schools. 19 b. For maintenance and lease costs associated with 20 connections for part III of the Iowa communications network: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,727,000 22 4. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES 23 For technology costs associated with the state poison 24 control center: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 34,000 26 5. DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT 27 For the continued implementation of a statewide mass 28 notification and emergency messaging system: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 400,000 30 6. DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT 31 a. For the continued development and implementation of 32 a searchable database that can be placed on the internet for 33 budget and financial information: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 45,000 35 -12- LSB 1008YC (10) 91 th/ns 12/ 20 H.F. _____ b. For the continued development and implementation of the 1 comprehensive electronic grant management system: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 70,000 3 c. For the upgrade of the local government budget and 4 property tax system: 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 120,000 6 d. For the annual licensing of a searchable database that is 7 placed on the internet for budget and financial information: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 358,429 9 e. For the security office of the chief information 10 officer, including for statewide endpoint detection and 11 response, cybersecurity incident investigation response, and 12 miscellaneous purposes: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,947,658 14 f. For the cost of equipment and computer software for the 15 continued development and implementation of Iowaâs criminal 16 justice information system: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,400,000 18 g. For the costs associated with the justice enterprise data 19 warehouse: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 282,664 21 h. For the costs associated with the justice enterprise data 22 warehouse transition: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 290,000 24 7. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC DEFENSE 25 For the purchase of software relating to state active-duty 26 tracking and for data conversion costs associated with 27 migrating technology platforms: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 220,000 29 8. TREASURER OF STATE 30 a. For the purchase of software relating to investment 31 tracking: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 192,000 33 b. For the purchase of software relating to banking 34 reconciliations: 35 -13- LSB 1008YC (10) 91 th/ns 13/ 20 H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 228,000 1 Sec. 10. REVERSION. For purposes of section 8.33, unless 2 specifically provided otherwise, unencumbered or unobligated 3 moneys from an appropriation made in this division of this Act 4 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for 5 the purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year that 6 ends two years after the end of the fiscal year for which the 7 appropriation is made. However, if the project or projects for 8 which such appropriation was made are completed in an earlier 9 fiscal year, unencumbered or unobligated moneys shall revert at 10 the close of that same fiscal year. 11 Sec. 11. Section 8.57C, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 12 to read as follows: 13 3. a. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 14 state to the technology reinvestment fund for the fiscal year 15 beginning July 1, 2025 2026 , and for each subsequent fiscal 16 year thereafter, the sum of seventeen million five hundred 17 thousand dollars. 18 b. There is appropriated from the rebuild Iowa 19 infrastructure fund for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 20 2023 2025 , and ending June 30, 2024 2026 , the sum of eighteen 21 million three hundred ninety thousand two hundred ninety 22 eighteen million two hundred sixty-nine thousand two hundred 23 seventeen dollars to the technology reinvestment fund, 24 notwithstanding section 8.57, subsection 3 , paragraph âcâ . 25 c. There is appropriated from the rebuild Iowa 26 infrastructure fund for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024, 27 and ending June 30, 2025, the sum of twenty-one million one 28 hundred thirty-one thousand eight hundred seventy-three dollars 29 to the technology reinvestment fund, notwithstanding section 30 8.57, subsection 3 , paragraph âcâ . 31 DIVISION III 32 CHANGES TO PRIOR APPROPRIATIONS 33 Sec. 12. 2021 Iowa Acts, chapter 167, section 2, as amended 34 by 2023 Iowa Acts, chapter 118, section 6, and 2024 Iowa Acts, 35 -14- LSB 1008YC (10) 91 th/ns 14/ 20 H.F. _____ chapter 1155, section 7, is amended to read as follows: 1 SEC. 2. REVERSION. 2 1. Except as provided in subsection 2, for purposes 3 of section 8.33 , unless specifically provided otherwise, 4 unencumbered or unobligated moneys from an appropriation made 5 in this division of this Act shall not revert but shall remain 6 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 7 close of the fiscal year that ends two years after the end of 8 the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made. However, 9 if the project or projects for which such appropriation was 10 made are completed in an earlier fiscal year, unencumbered 11 or unobligated moneys shall revert at the close of that same 12 fiscal year. 13 2. a. For purposes of section 8.33 , unless specifically 14 provided otherwise, unencumbered or unobligated moneys from 15 an appropriation made in section 1, subsection 10, paragraph 16 âdâ, of this division of this 2021 Iowa Act, as amended by 2022 17 Iowa Acts, chapter 1150, section 11 , shall not revert but shall 18 remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated 19 until the project for which the appropriation was made is 20 completed. 21 b. For purposes of section 8.33 , unencumbered or 22 unobligated moneys from an appropriation made in section 1, 23 subsection 4, of this division of this 2021 Iowa Act, shall 24 not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the 25 purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year that 26 ends three four years after the end of the fiscal year for 27 which the appropriation is made, or until the project for which 28 the appropriation was made is completed, whichever is earlier. 29 c. For purposes of section 8.33 , unencumbered or 30 unobligated moneys from an appropriation made in section 1, 31 subsection 16, of this division of this 2021 Iowa Act, as 32 amended by this 2024 Iowa Act, shall not revert but shall 33 remain available for expenditure for the purposes designated 34 until the close of the fiscal year that ends three four years 35 -15- LSB 1008YC (10) 91 th/ns 15/ 20 H.F. _____ after the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is 1 made, or until the project for which the appropriation was made 2 is completed, whichever is earlier. 3 Sec. 13. 2022 Iowa Acts, chapter 1150, section 2, as amended 4 by 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter 1155, section 9, is amended to read 5 as follows: 6 SEC. 2. REVERSION. 7 1. For purposes of section 8.33 , unless specifically 8 provided in subsection 2 or otherwise, unencumbered or 9 unobligated moneys from an appropriation made in this division 10 of this Act shall not revert but shall remain available for 11 expenditure for the purposes designated until the close of 12 the fiscal year that ends two years after the end of the 13 fiscal year for which the appropriation is made. However, 14 if the project or projects for which such appropriation was 15 made are completed in an earlier fiscal year, unencumbered 16 or unobligated moneys shall revert at the close of that same 17 fiscal year. 18 2. For purposes of section 8.33 , unencumbered or 19 unobligated moneys from an appropriation made in section 1, 20 subsection 4, of this division of this 2022 Iowa Act, shall 21 not revert but shall remain available for expenditure for the 22 purposes designated until the close of the fiscal year that 23 ends three four years after the end of the fiscal year for 24 which the appropriation is made, or until the project for which 25 the appropriation was made is completed, whichever is earlier. 26 Sec. 14. 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter 1155, section 1, subsection 27 1, paragraph b, is amended to read as follows: 28 b. For major maintenance projects at the Iowa state capitol 29 and for signage on capitol complex grounds : 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,000,000 31 (1) Of the amount appropriated in this paragraph, the 32 department of administrative services shall allocate and use 33 the moneys necessary to improve and repair the steps on the 34 west side of the exterior of the capitol building and for 35 -16- LSB 1008YC (10) 91 th/ns 16/ 20 H.F. _____ projects on the east side of the exterior of the capitol 1 building , as directed by the legislative branch, by the close 2 of the fiscal year that begins July 1, 2024 2025 . 3 (2) Of the amount appropriated in this paragraph, the 4 department of administrative services shall allocate and use 5 not more than $100,000 to purchase and erect signs on the state 6 capitol complex grounds, as directed by the legislative branch, 7 by the close of the fiscal year that begins July 1, 2025. 8 Sec. 15. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 9 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 10 DIVISION IV 11 DISTRICT COURT FURNISHINGS 12 Sec. 16. Section 602.1303, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 13 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 14 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. A county shall provide furnishings for 15 the use of judicial officers, referees, and their staff. 16 Sec. 17. Section 602.11101, subsection 1, paragraph e, 17 subparagraph (2), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 18 (2) (a) Until July 1, 1986, the county shall remain 19 responsible for the compensation of and operating costs for 20 court employees not presently designated for state financing 21 and for miscellaneous costs of the judicial branch related to 22 furnishings, supplies, and equipment purchased, leased, or 23 maintained for the use of judicial officers, referees, and 24 their staff. 25 (b) Effective July 1, 1986, except as provided in 26 subparagraph division (c) or (d), as applicable, the state 27 shall assume the responsibility for the compensation of and 28 operating costs for court employees presently designated for 29 state financing and for miscellaneous costs of the judicial 30 branch related to furnishings, supplies, and equipment 31 purchased, leased, or maintained for the use of judicial 32 officers, referees, and their staff. However, the county 33 shall at all times remain responsible for the provision of 34 suitable courtrooms, offices, and other physical facilities 35 -17- LSB 1008YC (10) 91 th/ns 17/ 20 H.F. _____ pursuant to section 602.1303, subsection 1 , including paint, 1 wall covering, and fixtures in the facilities. In addition, 2 however, effective 3 (c) Effective July 1, 2023, except as provided in 4 subparagraph division (d), if a county expends moneys for the 5 renovation or construction of suitable courtrooms, offices, and 6 other physical facilities pursuant to section 602.1303 , that 7 requires the purchase of furnishings, supplies, and equipment 8 for the use of judicial officers, referees, and their staff as 9 a result of that renovation or construction, the state shall be 10 responsible for only seventy-five percent of the cost of the 11 purchase. 12 (d) Effective July 1, 2025, the state is not responsible 13 for the cost of furnishings purchased, leased, or maintained 14 for the use of judicial officers, referees, and their staff in 15 physical facilities described in section 602.1303, subsection 16 1. 17